Wyoming statutes. Title 20 Domestic Relations
Article 2. Custody and Visitation
§ 20-2-201.
Disposition and maintenance of children in decree or order; access to records.

In granting a divorce, separation or annulment of a marriage or upon the establishment of paternity pursuant to W.S.

14-2-401

through

14-2-907

, the court may make by decree or order any disposition of the children that appears most expedient and in the best interests of the children. In determining the best interests of the child, the court shall consider, but is not limited to, the following factors:

The quality of the relationship each child has with each parent;

The ability of each parent to provide adequate care for each child throughout each period of responsibility, including arranging for each child’s care by others as needed;

The relative competency and fitness of each parent;

Each parent’s willingness to accept all responsibilities of parenting, including a willingness to accept care for each child at specified times and to relinquish care to the other parent at specified times;

How the parents and each child can best maintain and strengthen a relationship with each other;

How the parents and each child interact and communicate with each other and how such interaction and communication may be improved;

The ability and willingness of each parent to allow the other to provide care without intrusion, respect the other parent’s rights and responsibilities, including the right to privacy;

Geographic distance between the parents’ residences;

The current physical and mental ability of each parent to care for each child;

Any other factors the court deems necessary and relevant.

In any proceeding in which the custody of a child is at issue the court shall not prefer one (1) parent as a custodian solely because of gender.

The court shall consider evidence of spousal abuse or child abuse as being contrary to the best interest of the children. If the court finds that family violence has occurred, the court shall make arrangements for visitation that best protects the children and the abused spouse from further harm.

The court shall order custody in well defined terms to promote understanding and compliance by the parties. In determining custody a court shall not favor or disfavor any form of custody. Custody shall be crafted to promote the best interests of the children, and may include any combination of joint, shared or sole custody.

Unless otherwise ordered by the court, the noncustodial parent shall have the same right of access as the parent awarded custody to any records relating to the child of the parties, including school records, activities, teachers and teachers’ conferences as well as medical and dental treatment providers and mental health records.

At any time the court may require parents to attend appropriate parenting classes, including but not limited to, parenting classes to lessen the effects of divorce on children.

At anytime a court is considering the custody or visitation rights of a service member, as defined by W.S.

20-2-205

, the court shall comply with W.S.

20-2-205

.

A court finding of physical placement of a child in a child support order shall not be considered a disposition of custody under this section.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 1; 2003, ch. 93, § 2; 2011, ch. 36, § 2; 2015 ch. 113, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2018 ch. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

Cross references. —

For present provisions as to child support, see §

20-2-301

et seq.

For the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act, see chapter 5 of this title.

As to process, and service and filing of pleadings and other papers, see Rules 4 and 5, W.R.C.P.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added (g).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, added (h).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (d), added the second sentence.

Order did not include well defined terms. —

District court’s failure to determine how custody and visitation would work when the child started school undermined the stability of his environment and disregarded the requirement that it order custody in well defined terms to promote understanding and compliance by the parties. Martin v. Hart, 2018 WY 123, 429 P.3d 56,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 2018).

Change in circumstances warranted change in custody. —

Record supported the district court’s determination that it was in the child’s best interests to award primary custody to the mother; the father’s continuous interference with the mother’s relationship with the child and his refusal to follow the court’s orders despite being held in contempt of court weighed against the father retaining custody, plus the mother’s life had stabilized and she was more willing and capable of fostering a relationship between the child and the father. Bishop v. Bishop, 2017 WY 130, 404 P.3d 1170,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 2017).

Best Interests and Father's Behavior. —

District court's decision to give little weight to the father's behavior was not an abuse of discretion, as the evidence supported the finding that he was capable of caring for the child despite some poor decisions made during the parties' marriage, and he was a fit and competent parent. Williams v. Williams, 2016 WY 21, 368 P.3d 539,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2016).

Conditions on visitation. —

District court properly ordered a mother to refrain from using any alcohol during visitation with the children and to subject herself to chemical testing during the visitation periods because the appropriate use of controlled substances and alcohol were problematic in the mother’s life, and the court properly considered evidence presented at prior hearings regarding the mother’s behavior while using alcohol, which was certainly relevant to the best interests of the children. Kidd v. Jacobson, 2020 WY 64, 463 P.3d 795,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 2020).

Spousal Abuse. —

Trial court did consider the evidence of spousal abuse, and it did not abuse its discretion when it declined to base its custody decision on the evidence of abuse. Williams v. Williams, 2016 WY 21, 368 P.3d 539,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2016).

Primary Caregiver Factor. —

District court abused its discretion by failing to give appropriate weight to the fact that the mother acted as the child’s primary caregiver throughout her life, and finding contrary to the evidence that the father shared in the role of primary caregiver. Williams v. Williams, 2016 WY 21, 368 P.3d 539,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2016).

Trial court did not abuse its discretion when it granted the father primary physical and residential custody of the child after she entered kindergarten; contrary to the mother’s claim, the trial court did not ignore her primary caregiver status and noted that the father had a large support system in Wyoming, whereas the mother did not have a large support system in Idaho, plus the mother had given the father two weeks’ notice before moving, which move made his visitation schedule impossible. Walsh v. Smith, 2020 WY 25, 458 P.3d 58,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2020).

Change in residence. —

District court
appropriately evaluated and weighed the factors and declined to
change
custody from the mother to the father after the mother moved
from
Wyoming to Arizona where she found work; the mother had been
the
children's
primary caregiver, she had made good efforts to facilitate
a relationship
with the father, the district court was reluctant
to force her to
return to Wyoming, where she could not support herself,
and the trial
court ordered the father as much visitation as possible
under the
circumstances, such that there was no abuse of discretion. Greer v. Greer, 2017 WY 35, 391 P.3d 1127,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 2017).

District court abused its discretion in granting a custody modification petition prompted by a custodial mother’s relocation because the court did not consider (1) the impact of sibling separation, (2) the child’s separation from a primary caregiver, and (3) the mother’s motive or the possibility of reasonable visitation. Ianelli v. Camino, 2019 WY 67, 444 P.3d 61,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 2019).

Trial court did not abuse its discretion when it granted the father primary physical and residential custody of the child after she entered kindergarten; no serious question was ever raised regarding the relocation factors, the court made clear that its most pressing concern was the support network available to the child in each location and each parent’s willingness to put her needs above their own, and the court reasonably gave greater weight to factors other than the relocation factors. Walsh v. Smith, 2020 WY 25, 458 P.3d 58,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2020).

Findings for unconventional arrangements must appear on the record. —

Child custody decisions must be based upon the best interests of the children, with consideration given to the statutory factors of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-20(a). When the exercise of its discretion in custody matters involves splitting custody of children between parents or other unconventional custody approaches, the trial court must provide an explanation of its reasoning and place its findings on the record. Noonan v. Noonan, 2005 WY 145, 122 P.3d 964,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 2005).

Court, not parties, may revise decree. —

While agreements and stipulations between the divorced parties are presumed fair and favored by the courts, such agreements must be promptly submitted to the district court having jurisdiction to revise the original decree. The parties may not independently revise the decree; only the district court can do that, when warranted. McKenzie v. Shepard, 814 P.2d 701,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 1991).

Statutory powers not exclusive. —

The grant of power to provide for custody and care of children in connection with a decree granting a divorce does not abrogate the equitable powers of court existing independent thereof, nor does it limit exercise of the power granted in another statute under somewhat different circumstances. Urbach v. Urbach, 52 Wyo. 207, 73 P.2d 953,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1937).

Settlement agreement presumed to merge into decree. —

When, in the absence of clear and convincing evidence to the contrary, the parties enter into a settlement agreement in contemplation of divorce and the district court's divorce decree incorporates or adopts by reference that agreement, the agreement is presumed to merge into the decree and will no longer be given effect. Pauling v. Pauling, 837 P.2d 1073,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1992).

Two step analysis. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-201(a) sets forth factors to be considered in determining the best interests of a child in an initial custody proceeding, however, it is only during the second step of a modification inquiry that Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-204(c) requires consideration of the best interests of the child pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-201(a). A best interest analysis is not required, nor even necessarily appropriate, to the threshold determination as to whether a material change in circumstances has occurred. CLH v. MMJ (In re TLJ), 2006 WY 28, 129 P.3d 874,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 2006).

Parentage Act does not apply. —

The rules under the Wyoming Parentage Act (§

14-2-101

et seq.) do not apply where paternity of a child presumed to be a child of the marriage is determined by consent of the parties in a proceeding to modify a divorce decree to include a child conceived during the marriage but born afterward. CSP v. DDC, 842 P.2d 528,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1992).

Parental rights yield to rights of child. —

Recognition that parental rights are fundamental does not alter the cardinal rule that when the rights of a parent and the rights of a child collide, it is the rights of the parent which must yield. Basolo v. Basolo, 907 P.2d 348,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 213

(Wyo. 1995).

Limitation on child's using term “daddy” unenforceable. —

An order prohibiting the wife from encouraging or allowing the child to refer to anyone except the husband as “daddy” or any other such term was unenforceable, potentially abusive and overly broad. Gaines v. Doby, 773 P.2d 442,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 1989).

Divorce decree is res judicata on all issues therein decided,

as a general rule. Mentock v. Mentock, 638 P.2d 156,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 408

(Wyo. 1981).

Custody decrees not res judicata. —

Judgments awarding custody of child of divorced parents, necessarily provisional in character, ordinarily are not res judicata either in same court or that of another state, despite full faith and credit clause of federal constitution (article 4, § 1), except as to specific facts before court at time of any judgment in question. Linch v. Harden, 26 Wyo. 47, 176 P. 156,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1918).

Where Oregon court, which had divorced father, granted him custody of minor daughter on ground mother was not suitable custodian, Wyoming court thereafter, on showing mother was in situation and condition properly to care for child, properly awarded custody to her. Oregon order was conclusive only as to facts on which it was made. Linch v. Harden, 26 Wyo. 47, 176 P. 156,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1918).

Order amending order relative to custody of children of divorced parents, though appealable as final order, does not preclude further hearing on question of custody. Stirrett v. Stirrett, 35 Wyo. 206, 248 P. 1,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1926).

Default judgments as to custody or visitation. —

When the parties do not intentionally ignore the process involving the future of their child, default is not favored when the issue of child custody or visitation is before the court. Esquibel v. Esquibel, 917 P.2d 1150,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1996).

Postnuptial agreement restricting court's power invalid. —

A postnuptial agreement's provision attempting to restrict the court's proper custody determination by requiring that any child of the marriage be placed in the custody of the same sex parent was invalid, i.e., void as against public policy, in direct conflict with subsection (a). Combs v. Sherry-Combs, 865 P.2d 50,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 180

(Wyo. 1993).

Welfare of child paramount consideration. —

The goal to be achieved in dealing with the custody of children, is a reasonable balance of the rights and affections of each of the parents, with paramount consideration being given to the welfare and needs of the children. Leitner v. Lonabaugh, 402 P.2d 713,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 1965).

In child custody and support proceedings, the paramount concern of the court is the child's welfare. Bereman v. Bereman, 645 P.2d 1155,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 342

(Wyo. 1982).

In a custody dispute, a father's claim that the father should have been granted custody or visitation in France, based on a claim that the children were or could become French citizens, failed because (1) the claim was properly considered in the context of the statutory best interest factors, (2) the father did not comply with
Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

1-12-301

through

1-12-306

so as to allow the court to take judicial notice of French law, and (3) the father filed no transcript of the trial court's proceedings.
Harignordoquy v. Barlow, 2013 WY 149, 313 P.3d 1265,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. 2013), cert. denied, 574 U.S. 817, 135 S. Ct. 66, 190 L. Ed. 2d 33, 2014 U.S. LEXIS 5136 (U.S. 2014).

District court did not abuse its discretion in awarding primary custody of a child to the father because its detailed analysis demonstrated that it carefully considered the best interests of the child and determined that they would be served by awarding primary custody to the father. JCLK v. ZHB, 2015 WY 95, 353 P.3d 720,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 2015).

Court erred in modifying visitation schedule. —

Although the district court properly found a material change in circumstances that had negatively affected the children’s best interests based on the visitation location at the parties’ former marital residence, and properly modified the location for the father’s visitation, the district court erred in modifying the father’s visitation schedule to provide that the children would spend extended periods of time with him beyond what either party requested because it made no finding that would explain why such visitation was in the children’s best interests; and the record did not contain evidence that such a schedule was in the children’s best interests. Booth v. Booth, 2019 WY 5, 432 P.3d 902,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 2019).

No error in award of joint custody. —

Award of joint custody was proper given the need for stability and the absence of any serious issues with the parties’ arrangement and the fact that the parties had communication issues did not outweigh the children’s interest in seeing each parent as much as possible. Sears v. Sears, 2021 WY 20, 479 P.3d 767,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2021).

Gender as a factor in custody award. —

Consideration of gender is not prohibited in a custody determination; this section simply prohibits gender from being the sole basis of a custody award. Every case requires careful weighing of relevant factors, looking to the unique and individual family relationships, in order to reach a resolution that is in the best interests of the children. Donnelly v. Donnelly, 2004 WY 72, 92 P.3d 298,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 2004).

Gender as consideration in award of custody. —

Consideration of gender is not prevented in a custody award; the statute simply prohibits gender from being the sole basis of a custody award. Pace v. Pace, 2001 WY 43, 22 P.3d 861,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2001).

Ordinarily, the care and custody of young children should be awarded to the mother.

Butcher v. Butcher, 363 P.2d 923,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 1961).

Change from father to mother urgent as daughter became a teenager. —

Trial court did not err in changing child custody from the father to the mother when the daughter's preference to live with the mother had become more urgent as the daughter became a teenager, and the mother had changed her lifestyle. Basden v. Cole, 2005 WY 151, 123 P.3d 566,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(Wyo. 2005), reh'g denied,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. Dec. 20, 2005).

But maternal preference mistake of law. —

The trial court specifically stated that it was utilizing a maternal preference for a custody decision. This is a mistake of law, and not a matter of discretion. Fanning v. Fanning, 717 P.2d 346,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 526

(Wyo. 1986).

And custody may be awarded father in interests of children. —

Custody of children will be awarded to the father when it appears that the best interests of the children will be promoted, and while young children of tender age are ordinarily awarded to the mother, that rule is not inflexible. Butcher v. Butcher, 363 P.2d 923,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 1961).

Domestic violence in home that mother shared with boyfriend amounted to a material change in circumstances that warranted awarding primary custody to father. Cobb v. Cobb, 2 P.3d 578,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 2000), reh'g denied,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. May 23, 2000).

Trial court did not abuse its discretion in modifying custody decree and granting physical custody of the parties' children to the father. The district court found there was no real change in the mother's circumstances, citing she continued to live with her parents, they continued to provide for her and her children, she had been through numerous jobs, and she continued to prowl the bars at least two nights each week while her parents looked after the children. In contrast, the court found significant changes in the father's circumstances, including: regular employment for over 18 months, financial responsibility for himself and his children, and lifestyle changes which enhanced his ability to parent his children including the providing of health insurance for the children, his stoppage of smoking, drinking and chewing, and his remarriage. Jackson v. Jackson, 2004 WY 99, 96 P.3d 21,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 2004).

Sufficient evidence for change of custody. —

Sufficient evidence supported the court's change of custody in favor of the father, even though
there was favorable testimony in favor of the mother, where the father was better able to provide an environment which could meet the child's emotional, developmental, and educational needs and the father and his wife could provide the child with a more stable home.
Gray v. Pavey, 2007 WY 84, 158 P.3d 667,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 2007).

Thus, he may be awarded custody where he cannot support them in mother's home. —

The custody of children may be awarded to the father when it appears that he will be able to provide a suitable home for them but will not be able to support himself and furnish an allowance to the mother which will enable her to properly take care of the children. Butcher v. Butcher, 363 P.2d 923,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 1961).

Change in circumstances warranted change in custody. —

Court did not err in modifying child custody where in addition to considering the mother's multiple relocations, it found that the mother had not maintained stable employment and had not provided adequate supervision of the children, she repeatedly interfered with the father's parental and visitation rights and failed to provide adequate treatment to the youngest daughter for her emotional problems until compelled to provide therapy by court order, and there was evidence that the mother had attempted to emotionally manipulate the children against their father. Harshberger v. Harshberger, 2005 WY 99, 117 P.3d 1244,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 2005).

Change in circumstances occurred and it was in the best interests of the children to grant primary physical custody to the father where his efforts to improve his life personally and professionally, juxtaposed with the mother's instability and reliance on her parents for support of her and the two children, was determinative. Jackson v. Jackson, 2004 WY 99, 96 P.3d 21,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 2004).

In a child custody modification case where there was a split custody arrangement, the trial court erred in not finding that a material change in circumstances had occurred. The mother's relocation to another state could be viewed as such, so too that the mother's fiance and her brother were accused of sexually assaulting the parties' youngest daughter, and that the father's wife's abusive acts against her step-children could warrant a change. Thus the case was remanded for further proceedings. JRS v. GMS, 2004 WY 60, 90 P.3d 718,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 2004).

Court balances parents' rights and affection. —

The objective for the trial court is to find a reasonable balance of the rights and affection of each of the parents, in light of the child's needs. Bereman v. Bereman, 645 P.2d 1155,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 342

(Wyo. 1982).

Where the trial court allowed the father to offset his past-due child support obligation by the amount of damages sustained as a result of the mother's violation of the parties' property agreement, though the father's property, wrongfully retained by the mother, was not used for the exclusive benefit of the child, and the debts which the father paid were not those of the child, the setoff between judgments impaired the child's right to support and was improper. Broyles v. Broyles, 711 P.2d 1119,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 614

(Wyo. 1985).

Preference of child. —

A child's unequivocal preference to live with a particular parent is a factor that, although not conclusive, must be considered. Wilcox-Elliott v. Wilcox, 924 P.2d 419,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 1996), overruled, Clark v. Alexander, 953 P.2d 145,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1998).

District court did not abuse its discretion in considering the child's stated preference of living with the mother where it was not persuaded that the 10-year old child was mature enough to decide what was in his best interest, and the child showed no hostility toward either parent and stated that he was okay living with either parent. Demers v. Nicks, 2016 WY 13, 366 P.3d 977,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 2016).

Beyond the district court noting that the mother believed the children preferred to live with her, the children did not testify and were not interviewed as to their preference, and the mother waived this argument by failing to put on any direct evidence on her own behalf. JR v. TLW, 2016 WY 45, 371 P.3d 570,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 2016).

Judge may honor child's long-standing preference and award primary custody to father. —

There was no abuse of discretion in the judge's determination that the father should have primary custody of his 15-year-old daughter, who had stated a preference to live with her father as far back as the original divorce proceeding, some five years prior to the filing of the petition to modify visitation, and had not changed that preference. Yates v. Yates, 702 P.2d 1252,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 499

(Wyo. 1985).

Separation of siblings permissible.—

Trial court did not abuse its discretion when it granted the father primary physical and residential custody of the child after she entered kindergarten; the trial court did not err by failing to expressly address the effect of separating the child from her younger half-brother, and as the parties did not request formal findings on the issue, the mother could not complain about the lack of them. The mother also did not raise the sibling separation issue while the father did and the record showed that the court considered the issue. Walsh v. Smith, 2020 WY 25, 458 P.3d 58,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2020).

The court did not abuse its discretion by awarding primary custody of the younger son to the father and granting primary custody of the other two children to the mother, where evidence existed showing that: the father was a fit, capable parent; the younger son preferred to live with his father; the younger son's performance and behavior improved while with the father; and the parents lived about 100 yards apart. Dowdy v. Dowdy, 864 P.2d 439,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 1993).

Trial court did not abuse its discretion in a divorce action in awarding primary residential custody of the parties'
two children to the father because reasonable minds could have reached different conclusions about which parent's custody would have been in the best interests of the children under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-201(a); the trial court's oral findings were sufficiently detailed so as to provide an adequate basis for its determination awarding the father custody of the children, effectively separating them from their half-brothers for much of the time.
Blakely v. Blakely, 2009 WY 127, 218 P.3d 253,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 2009).

Although the district court should have analyzed the effects of separating a child from his half-siblings and should have explained its reasons for doing so on the record, it did not commit reversible error because the record provided sufficient evidence to support the award of primary custody of the child to the father. JCLK v. ZHB, 2015 WY 95, 353 P.3d 720,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 2015).

Supervised visitation.—

It was not an abuse of discretion to order supervision of a father’s visitation because (1) the father’s statutory right to associate with the children did not apply, (2) the evidence supported findings that the father abused the children, and (3) the evidence supported findings conditioning the father’s unsupervised visitation on the father’s and the children’s therapy. Johnson v. Johnson, 2020 WY 18, 458 P.3d 27,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 2020).

Financial condition of parties is important factor in making award. —

One of the main factors to be considered in awarding custody of children is the financial and economic condition of the respective parties because of the fact that the children must be fed and clothed. Butcher v. Butcher, 363 P.2d 923,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 1961).

When the question involves support payments, the matter should be decided with consideration of the paying parent's ability to pay, the recipient's spending habits and all other surrounding circumstances. Mentock v. Mentock, 638 P.2d 156,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 408

(Wyo. 1981).

The “best-interest of the child” requirement is attendant with educational opportunity and a stable environment for which economic resources are not insignificant. Fanning v. Fanning, 717 P.2d 346,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 526

(Wyo. 1986).

No error in awarding primary custody to father. —

See Fink v. Fink, 685 P.2d 34,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 321

(Wyo. 1984).

District court properly granted custody to father where there was evidence that the mother did not demonstrate a willingness to relinquish care of the child to the father at specified times; for example, mother took the child away from the father on the third day of a five-day camping trip. Additionally, father knew and followed the child's bedroom routine but mother would get the child up to brush his teeth and wash his hands, and while mother would enforce a 7:00 curfew when the child was with the father, she did not always enforce it when the child was with her. Pahl v. Pahl, 2004 WY 40, 87 P.3d 1250,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 2004).

In a decree of divorce, the court did not abuse its discretion by awarding the father primary child custody. While the evidence favored both parties, the court considered the fact that alcohol negatively impacted the mother's relationship with her children and she chose to move in with a man a mere eight weeks after meeting him. Lopez v. Lopez, 2005 WY 88, 116 P.3d 1098,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 2005).

District court did not abuse its discretion in its consideration of the mother's evidence of spousal abuse because the record showed that district court considered the evidence and it could have reasonably determined from the totality of evidence that mother should have primary legal custody subject to liberal visitation by the father.
Buttle v. Buttle, 2008 WY 135, 196 P.3d 174,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 2008), overruled in part, Bruegman v. Bruegman, 2018 WY 49, 417 P.3d 157,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 2018).

Trial court
did not abuse its discretion by awarding a mother liberal visitation
after finding that it was not in a child's best interest for the
mother
to have the child during night time hours; there was no de
facto shared
custody with a father because the mother's visitation
was limited
to three weekends a month and two weekdays per week.
Moreover, no
abuse of discretion resulted from the fact that the
child and a sibling
might not have been together during the entirety
of the mother's visitation. Davidson v. Carrillo, 2014 WY 65, 325 P.3d 444,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2014).

District court did not abuse its discretion in awarding the father primary custody where it had considered the parties' existing arrangement and explained why it no longer worked in light of the mother's imminent relocation to another state. Demers v. Nicks, 2016 WY 13, 366 P.3d 977,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 2016).

District court found that the mother's role as the primary caregiver was not in the children's best interests, given her claim to values superior than those of the father, her reluctance to foster a positive relationship between the father and the children by openly disparaging him, and her inability to respect the father's rights as a parent without intrusion; no abuse of discretion was found. JR v. TLW, 2016 WY 45, 371 P.3d 570,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 2016).

District court’s shift from shared custody to primary physical custody with the father and visitation with the mother when the child entered school was appropriate where the only thing the district court had assumed was that the child’s age would change. Bruegman v. Bruegman, 2018 WY 49, 417 P.3d 157,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 2018).

District court’s award of primary custody to the father was affirmed where it considered the quality of relationship with each parent, the ability of each parent to provide adequate care for each child, how the parents and child maintained and strengthened their relationship with each other, how the parents and child interacted and communicated, how such communications could be improved, and other relevant factors. Bruegman v. Bruegman, 2018 WY 49, 417 P.3d 157,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 2018).

District court reasonably decided that due to the importance of the parties’ child, who suffered from autism spectrum disorder, having a known and set schedule rather than imposing a new and different schedule that likely would have caused disruption and instability to the child, it was in the child’s best interest to continue with the arrangement of the child living with the father that had by then been in place for months pursuant to the parties’ agreement after the mother left town and then returned. Ransom v. Ransom, 2017 WY 132, 404 P.3d 1187,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 2017).

No error in award of primary custody to mother. —

The trial court did not abuse its discretion in awarding the mother primary care, custody, and control of the child where (1) although both parents were fit parents who loved their child, the evidence showed that the parties had a hard time getting along and that there was often little to no communication between them and thus shared custody would be inappropriate; (2) although the mother was from Columbia, she clearly testified that she had no intention of moving to Columbia; and (3) daycare, which child would attend if placed with the mother, was appropriate for the child rather than placing the child with the father, who did not work because of a disability, because it provided a good opportunity for social engagement for the child. Groenstein v. Groenstein, 2005 WY 6, 104 P.3d 765,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 2005).

District court did not abuse its discretion by awarding custody of a child to a mother;
although the district court did not address the parties' respective work schedules, this did not mean that it necessarily ignored this factor; moreover, it was not an abuse of discretion for the district court to find for the mother, even though there were inconsistencies in her testimony. Bingham v. Bingham, 2007 WY 145, 167 P.3d 14,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 2007).

Court did not abuse its discretion in finding that it was in the best interests of the children for the mother to have primary custody because the court clearly considered the effect that the mother's arrest, which resulted in a deferral, had on the children, and the 16-year-old son's testimony clearly demonstrated that he preferred the living arrangement he had with mother. Dahlke v. Dahlke, 2015 WY 76, 351 P.3d 937,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 2015).

There was
sufficient evidence to support the district court's conclusion that
it was in the child's best interests to give the mother primary physical
custody and allow the father to develop a healthy relationship with
the child through visitation; the district court examined each factor
in the statute, took into account the complex reality of the situation,
and noted in part that the father’s employment and avocation
interfered with his efforts, and the mother had put her education
on hold and attended to the child nearly continuously since he was
born. IC v. DW, 2015 WY 135, 360 P.3d 999,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 2015).

Gender as a factor in custody award.—

Custody decision
was not based solely on gender; the district court adhered to its
statement that in deciding to award physical custody to the mother,
the district court had not preferred the mother solely because of
gender, and the district court properly based its decision upon objective criteria and related evidence without gender bias. IC v. DW, 2015 WY 135, 360 P.3d 999,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 2015).

Plans to move abroad proper consideration. —

District court did not abuse its discretion in awarding primary custody of a child to the father; although the mother was the primary caregiver, that factor was not necessarily determinative, and the mother's plan to move to Germany with the child was properly considered because the move would have limited the father's ability to exercise regular visitation. Pahl v. Pahl, 2004 WY 40, 87 P.3d 1250,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 2004).

Plan to abscond with children relevant consideration. —

Evidence that a parent planned to abscond with children who were the subject of a pending custody battle, and thereby deny the other parent visitation, was relevant to an initial custody determination. Mintle v. Mintle, 764 P.2d 255,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1988), reh'g denied,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. Dec. 1, 1988).

Absence of formal findings where no request made. —

Where a father did not request that the district court make findings of fact pursuant to W.R.C.P. 52(a), he could not complain of the absence of formal findings with respect to each factor listed in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

20-2-201

. Stonham v. Widiastuti, 2003 WY 157, 79 P.3d 1188,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 2003).

Ample evidence supported custody with mother in Indonesia. —

Although the district court did not make specific findings with respect to each factor listed in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

20-2-201

, there was ample evidence in the record and in the district court's findings to support its determination that awarding the mother, a citizen of Indonesia, physical custody was in the children's best interest. The mother had been the children's primary caretaker; she was emotionally better equipped to care for the children; and she had the support of a stable, supportive, and loving family in Indonesia. Stonham v. Widiastuti, 2003 WY 157, 79 P.3d 1188,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 2003).

Visitation schedule reasonable. —

Where a father was granted two weeks of visitation in the spring, two weeks in the fall, four weeks in the summer, and any other visitation that he was able to exercise, it was reasonable under the circumstances as primary physical custody was awarded to the mother, a native and citizen of Indonesia. Stonham v. Widiastuti, 2003 WY 157, 79 P.3d 1188,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 2003).

Bond requirement for visitation. —

The court did not err in imposing a $50,000 bond requirement as a condition of exercising visitiation in light of the contentious nature of the case and reported statements by the father that he planned to kidnap the children; there was no evidence that the bond was penal in nature, and it bore a reasonable relationship to the expenses the mother would have incurred if she were compelled to enforce the custody order from her home in Indonesia. Stonham v. Widiastuti, 2003 WY 157, 79 P.3d 1188,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 2003).

Appellate court reviews for abuse of discretion. —

Court did not err in awarding custody of two children to mother during the school/work week (Sunday afternoon through Thursday) and to the father Thursday evening through Sunday. Evidence showed that the mother was a “stay at home mom” who maintained the home, helped with children with basic educational skills, and provided transportation, but father was a very engaged parent who worked a 40-plus hour work week but helped the mother with most of the child-rearing tasks. Donnelly v. Donnelly, 2004 WY 72, 92 P.3d 298,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 2004).

Decision will not be disturbed on appeal unless discretion abused. —

The district court's decision in regard to custody of children will not be disturbed on appeal in the absence of abuse of discretion or the violation of some legal principle. Gill v. Gill, 363 P.2d 86,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 1961).
